Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3093.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-128.1 of the General Laws entitled "Lead Hazard Mitigation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-128.1-15. Lead hazard mitigation in building renovations.
(a) Any mill or other building built before the year 1978 that is being renovated for housing,
offices or any other purpose shall comply with the provisions of chapter 24.6 of title 23 ("lead
poisoning prevention act") and chapter 21 of title 28 ("hazardous substances right-to-know act").
(b) Any person or firm performing any renovation project referenced in subsection (a) of
this section, shall register the project with the department of labor and training (DLT) prior to
beginning any work.
(c) Any person or firm performing any renovation project referenced in subsection (a) of
this section, shall be or have engaged, a lead contractor as that term is defined in § 23-24.6-4.
(d) Any employee of the person or firm performing any renovation project referenced in
subsection (a) of this section, shall be required to have a minimum of twenty-four (24) hours of
lead worker training in compliance with § 28-21-9.
(e) Any person or firm performing any renovation project referenced in subsection (a) of
this section shall have a lead work supervisor present and on site for a minimum of forty (40) hours
per week.
(f) DLT shall have authority to enforce all lead standards and ensure compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and with chapter 24.6 of title 23 and chapter 21 of title 28.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the enforcement powers of the
attorney general or of any private cause of action authorized by law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006000
========
LC006000 - Page 2 of 3